searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/russian/stem_KOI8_R.sbl
/*

Copyright (c) 2001, Dr Martin Porter
Copyright (c) 2002, Richard Boulton
All rights reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with 
or without modification, are permitted provided that the 
following conditions are met:

*	Redistributions of source code must retain the 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and 
	the following disclaimer. 
*	Redistributions in binary form must reproduce 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and
 	the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or 
	other materials provided with the distribution. 
*	Neither the name of the <ORGANIZATION> nor the 
	names of its contributors may be used to endorse or 
	promote products derived from this software without
	specific rior written permission. 

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND 
CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, 
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF 
MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE 
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR 
CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, 
SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, 
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR 
SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS 
INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, 
WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING 
NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE 
OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH 
DAMAGE.

*/

stringescapes {}

/* the 32 Cyrillic letters in the KOI8-R coding scheme, and represented
   in Latin characters following the conventions of the standard Library
   of Congress transliteration: */

stringdef a    hex 'C1'
stringdef b    hex 'C2'
stringdef v    hex 'D7'
stringdef g    hex 'C7'
stringdef d    hex 'C4'
stringdef e    hex 'C5'
stringdef zh   hex 'D6'
stringdef z    hex 'DA'
stringdef i    hex 'C9'
stringdef i`   hex 'CA'
stringdef k    hex 'CB'
stringdef l    hex 'CC'
stringdef m    hex 'CD'
stringdef n    hex 'CE'
stringdef o    hex 'CF'
stringdef p    hex 'D0'
stringdef r    hex 'D2'
stringdef s    hex 'D3'
stringdef t    hex 'D4'
stringdef u    hex 'D5'
stringdef f    hex 'C6'
stringdef kh   hex 'C8'
stringdef ts   hex 'C3'
stringdef ch   hex 'DE'
stringdef sh   hex 'DB'
stringdef shch hex 'DD'
stringdef "    hex 'DF'
stringdef y    hex 'D9'
stringdef '    hex 'D8'
stringdef e`   hex 'DC'
stringdef iu   hex 'C0'
stringdef ia   hex 'D1'

routines ( mark_regions R2
           perfective_gerund
           adjective
           adjectival
           reflexive
           verb
           noun
           derivational
           tidy_up
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p2 )

groupings ( v )

define v '{a}{e}{i}{o}{u}{y}{e`}{iu}{ia}'

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do (
        gopast v  setmark pV  gopast non-v
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
       )
)

backwardmode (

    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define perfective_gerund as (
        [substring] among (
            '{v}'
            '{v}{sh}{i}'
            '{v}{sh}{i}{s}{'}'
                ('{a}' or '{ia}' delete)
            '{i}{v}'
            '{i}{v}{sh}{i}'
            '{i}{v}{sh}{i}{s}{'}'
            '{y}{v}'
            '{y}{v}{sh}{i}'
            '{y}{v}{sh}{i}{s}{'}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define adjective as (
        [substring] among (
            '{e}{e}' '{i}{e}' '{y}{e}' '{o}{e}' '{i}{m}{i}' '{y}{m}{i}'
            '{e}{i`}' '{i}{i`}' '{y}{i`}' '{o}{i`}' '{e}{m}' '{i}{m}'
            '{y}{m}' '{o}{m}' '{e}{g}{o}' '{o}{g}{o}' '{e}{m}{u}'
            '{o}{m}{u}' '{i}{kh}' '{y}{kh}' '{u}{iu}' '{iu}{iu}' '{a}{ia}'
            '{ia}{ia}'
                        // and -
            '{o}{iu}'   // - which is somewhat archaic
            '{e}{iu}'   // - soft form of {o}{iu}
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define adjectival as (
        adjective

        /* of the participle forms, em, vsh, ivsh, yvsh are readily removable.
           nn, {iu}shch, shch, u{iu}shch can be removed, with a small proportion of
           errors. Removing im, uem, enn creates too many errors.
        */

        try (
            [substring] among (
                '{e}{m}'                  // present passive participle
                '{n}{n}'                  // adjective from past passive participle
                '{v}{sh}'                 // past active participle
                '{iu}{shch}' '{shch}'     // present active participle
                    ('{a}' or '{ia}' delete)

     //but not  '{i}{m}' '{u}{e}{m}'      // present passive participle
     //or       '{e}{n}{n}'               // adjective from past passive participle

                '{i}{v}{sh}' '{y}{v}{sh}'// past active participle
                '{u}{iu}{shch}'          // present active participle
                    (delete)
            )
        )

    )

    define reflexive as (
        [substring] among (
            '{s}{ia}'
            '{s}{'}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define verb as (
        [substring] among (
            '{l}{a}' '{n}{a}' '{e}{t}{e}' '{i`}{t}{e}' '{l}{i}' '{i`}'
            '{l}' '{e}{m}' '{n}' '{l}{o}' '{n}{o}' '{e}{t}' '{iu}{t}'
            '{n}{y}' '{t}{'}' '{e}{sh}{'}'

            '{n}{n}{o}'
                ('{a}' or '{ia}' delete)

            '{i}{l}{a}' '{y}{l}{a}' '{e}{n}{a}' '{e}{i`}{t}{e}'
            '{u}{i`}{t}{e}' '{i}{t}{e}' '{i}{l}{i}' '{y}{l}{i}' '{e}{i`}'
            '{u}{i`}' '{i}{l}' '{y}{l}' '{i}{m}' '{y}{m}' '{e}{n}'
            '{i}{l}{o}' '{y}{l}{o}' '{e}{n}{o}' '{ia}{t}' '{u}{e}{t}'
            '{u}{iu}{t}' '{i}{t}' '{y}{t}' '{e}{n}{y}' '{i}{t}{'}'
            '{y}{t}{'}' '{i}{sh}{'}' '{u}{iu}' '{iu}'
                (delete)
            /* note the short passive participle tests:
               '{n}{a}' '{n}' '{n}{o}' '{n}{y}'
               '{e}{n}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{n}{o}' '{e}{n}{y}'
            */
        )
    )

    define noun as (
        [substring] among (
            '{a}' '{e}{v}' '{o}{v}' '{i}{e}' '{'}{e}' '{e}'
            '{i}{ia}{m}{i}' '{ia}{m}{i}' '{a}{m}{i}' '{e}{i}' '{i}{i}'
            '{i}' '{i}{e}{i`}' '{e}{i`}' '{o}{i`}' '{i}{i`}' '{i`}'
            '{i}{ia}{m}' '{ia}{m}' '{i}{e}{m}' '{e}{m}' '{a}{m}' '{o}{m}'
            '{o}' '{u}' '{a}{kh}' '{i}{ia}{kh}' '{ia}{kh}' '{y}' '{'}'
            '{i}{iu}' '{'}{iu}' '{iu}' '{i}{ia}' '{'}{ia}' '{ia}'
                (delete)
            /* the small class of neuter forms '{e}{n}{i}' '{e}{n}{e}{m}'
               '{e}{n}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{n}{a}{m}' '{e}{n}{a}{m}{i}' '{e}{n}{a}{x}'
               omitted - they only occur on 12 words.
            */
        )
    )

    define derivational as (
        [substring] R2 among (
            '{o}{s}{t}'
            '{o}{s}{t}{'}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define tidy_up as (
        [substring] among (

            '{e}{i`}{sh}'
            '{e}{i`}{sh}{e}'  // superlative forms
               (delete
                ['{n}'] '{n}' delete
               )
            '{n}'
               ('{n}' delete) // e.g. -nno endings
            '{'}'
               (delete)  // with some slight false conflations
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

    do mark_regions
    backwards setlimit tomark pV for (
        do (
             perfective_gerund or
             ( try reflexive
               adjectival or verb or noun
             )
        )
        try([ '{i}' ] delete)
        // because noun ending -i{iu} is being treated as verb ending -{iu}

        do derivational
        do tidy_up
    )
)
